en: Hardware > Building Materials > Lumber & Sheet Stock: Hardwood Lumber; Plywood; Softwood Lumber
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 建材 > 木材和片料: 硬木木材; 胶合板; 软木木材
ko: 철물 > 건축 자재 > 판재/시트 스톡: 견목재; 합판; 연목재
sk-SK: Náradie > Stavebné materiály > Rezivo a plech: Tvrdé drevo; Preglejka; Mäkké drevo
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Οικοδομικά υλικά > Ξυλεία & φύλλα: Ξυλεία από σκληρό ξύλο; Κόντρα πλακέ; Ξυλεία από μαλακό ξύλο
da: Isenkram > Byggematerialer > Tømmer: Hårdttræ; Krydsfiner; Blødt træ
zh-TW: 硬體 > 建材 > 儲存木材/木板/木片: 硬木木材; 合板; 軟木木材
fr: Quincaillerie > Matériaux de construction > Planches et bois d’œuvre: Planches de bois dur; Contre-plaqué; Bois d’œuvre tendre
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Materiali da costruzione > Legname: Legname di legno duro; Compensato; Legname di conifere
ja: DIY用品 > 建築材料 > 木材: 広葉樹材; 合板; 針葉樹材
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Statybinės medžiagos > Mediena ir fanera: Kietmedžio mediena; Fanera; Spygliuočių mediena
hu: Hardver > Építőanyagok > Fűrészáru és lemezkészlet: Keményfa-fűrészáru; Furnér; Puhafa-fűrészáru
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały budowlane > Drewno: Tarcica liściasta; Sklejka; Tarcica iglasta
hr-HR: Željezarija > Građevinski materijali > Drvna građa i ploče: Tvrdo drvo; Šperploča; Meko drvo
es: Bricolaje > Materiales de construcción > Madera: Madera dura; Madera contrachapada; Madera blanda
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Строительные изделия > Лесоматериалы и листовые материалы из дерева: Лесоматериалы из лиственных пород; Фанера; Лесоматериалы из хвойных пород
bg-BG: Железария > Строителни материали > Дървен материал и плоскости: Дървен материал от твърда дървесина; Шперплат; Дървен материал от иглолистна дървесина
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Stavební materiály > Stavební dřevo: Tvrdé dřevo; Překližka; Měkké dřevo
pt-PT: Equipamento > Materiais de construção > Armazenamento de madeira e folhas: Madeira serrada; Contraplacado; Madeira macia
vi: Phần cứng > Vật liệu xây dựng > Gỗ xẻ & Nguyên liệu tấm kim loại: Gỗ cứng; Gỗ ép; Gỗ xẻ mềm
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Baumaterialien > Bauholz: Laubholz; Sperrholz; Nadelholz
fi: Rakentaminen > Rakennusmateriaalit > Puutavara ja rakennuslevyt: Kovapuu; Vaneri; Pehmeä puu
ro-RO: Feronerie > Materiale de construcții > Cherestea și foi de cherestea: Cherestea din lemn de esență tare; Placaj; Cherestea din lemn de esență moale
nb: Maskinvare > Bygningsmaterialer > Trevare og treplater: Hard trelast; Kryssfiner; Myk trelast
sv: Metallprodukter > Byggnadsmaterial > Timmer och plywood: Lövträvirke; Plywood; Barrträvirke
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > วัสดุก่อสร้าง > ไม้อัดและไม้แปรรูป: ไม้อัดเนื้อแข็ง; แผ่นไม้อัด; ไม้อัดเนื้ออ่อน
pt-BR: Ferragens > Materiais de construção > Madeira cortada: Madeira de lei; Madeira compensada; Madeira macia
tr: Hırdavat > Yapı Malzemeleri > Kereste: Sertağaç Kereste; Kontrplak; Yumuşak Ağaç Kereste
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Afbouwmaterialen > Timmerhout: Looftimmerhout; Multiplex; Naaldtimmerhout
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Gradbeni materiali > Les in plošče: Lesene deske; Vezane plošče; Mehki les